District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-1059

Sunset.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 3032, 57 DCR 6242

Cross References

Superior Court of the District of Columbia, jurisdiction, see § 11-921.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 1402 of the Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Temporary Act of 2010 (D.C. Law 18-222, September 24, 2010, law notification 57 DCR 9859).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(b) of Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-366, April 5, 2010, 57 DCR 3168).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1402 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1402 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3032 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Short Title

Short title: Section 3031 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle D of title III of the act may be cited as the “Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board Act of 2010”.